Washington statutes.
RCW 36.96.085

Dissolved special purpose district—Property tax levies or special assessments—When authorized.

A county that dissolves a special purpose district under this chapter may impose a separate regular property tax levy or a special assessment as provided in RCW 84.55.135 if that county assumes responsibility of the services previously provided by the special purpose district.

[ 2020 c 179 s 5.]